South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5308.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 33, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 9 Certification of Photovoltaic Energy Facilities on Farmland Section 58-33-510. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the "Solar, Agricultural, Farmland, and Environmental Act." Section 58-33-520. As used in this article, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context: (1) "Clemson Extension" means the Clemson University Cooperative Extension Service. (2) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission. (3) "Commence to construct" means any clearing of land, excavation, or other action that would adversely affect the natural environment of the site or route of a photovoltaic energy facility on farmland, but does not include surveying or changes needed for temporary use of sites or routes for nonutility purposes, or uses in securing geological data, including necessary borings to ascertain foundation conditions. (4) "Farmland" means any land that is taxable as agricultural land and has been utilized to grow crops, other than timber, that could have been sold for a profit within the previous five calendar years. Land used for timber is not considered farmland for purposes of this article. (5) "Municipality" means any county or municipality within this State. (6) "Person" includes any individual, group, firm, partnership, corporation, cooperative, association, governmental subdivision, governmental agency, local government, municipality, any other organization, or any combination of any of the foregoing, and includes the South Carolina Public Service Authority. (7) "Photovoltaic energy facility" means a facility where electricity is generated by capturing energy by photovoltaic systems or solar thermal systems and the facility occupies a space that is twenty acres or greater. (8) "Public utility" or "utility" means any person engaged in the generating, distributing, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity for public use. (9) "Land" means any real estate or any estate or interest therein, including water and riparian rights, regardless of the use to which it is devoted. (10) "Certificate" means a certificate of environmental compatibility and public convenience and necessity. (11) "Regulatory Staff" means the Executive Director or the Executive Director and the employees of the Office of Regulatory Staff. Section 58-33-530. (A)(1) No person shall commence to construct a photovoltaic energy facility on farmland without first having obtained a certificate issued with respect to that facility by the commission. The replacement of an existing photovoltaic energy facility with a like facility, as determined by the commission, shall not constitute construction of a photovoltaic energy facility. Any photovoltaic energy facility, with respect to which a certificate is required, shall be constructed, operated, and maintained in conformity with the certificate and any terms, conditions, and modifications contained therein. A certificate may only be issued pursuant to this article; provided, however, any authorization relating to a photovoltaic energy facility on farmland granted under other laws administered by the commission shall constitute a certificate if the requirements of this article have been complied with in the proceeding leading to the granting of such authorization. (2) All land that is taxable as agricultural land upon which an applicant seeks to construct a photovoltaic energy facility is considered farmland for purposes of this article unless and until the applicant has a determination in writing from the Clemson Extension that the land upon which it seeks to construct a photovoltaic energy facility is not farmland as defined in this article. A copy of all requests for a determination from the Clemson Extension as to whether land is farmland must be provided to the Regulatory Staff on the day on which the request is made. To the extent a person seeks to construct a photovoltaic energy facility on land that is determined by the Clemson Extension to not be farmland, it is not subject to the terms of this article (B) A certificate may be transferred, subject to the approval of the commission, to a person who agrees to comply with the terms, conditions and modifications contained therein. (C) A certificate may be amended, subject to the approval of the commission. (D) This article shall not apply to any photovoltaic energy facility on farmland, for which: (1) construction of the photovoltaic energy facility is commenced within one year after January 1, 2023; (2) prior to January 1, 2023, an application for the approval has been made to any federal, state, regional, or local governmental agency which possesses the jurisdiction to consider the matters described in Section 58-33-580(A); or (3) prior to January 1, 2023, a governmental agency has approved the construction of the photovoltaic energy facility and indebtedness has been incurred to finance all or part of the cost of such construction. (E) Any person intending to construct a photovoltaic energy facility on farmland excluded from this article pursuant to subsection (D) may elect to waive the exclusion by delivering notice of the waiver to the commission. This article shall thereafter apply to each photovoltaic energy facility constructed on farmland identified in the notice from the date of its receipt by the commission. (F) The commission shall have authority to waive the normal notice and hearing requirements of this article and to issue a certificate on an emergency basis if it finds that immediate construction of a photovoltaic energy facility on farmland is justified by public convenience and necessity, provided, that the commission must notify all parties concerned pursuant to Section 55-33-560 prior to the issuance of the certificate. The commission may subsequently require a modification of the facility if, after giving due consideration to the photovoltaic energy facility on farmland, available technology and the economics involved, it finds the modification necessary in order to minimize the environmental impact. (G) The commission shall have authority, where justified by public convenience and necessity, to grant permission to a person who has made application for a certificate pursuant to Section 58-33-540 to proceed with initial clearing, excavation, dredging, and construction; provided, however, that in engaging in such clearing, excavation, dredging, or construction, the person shall proceed at his own risk, and such permission shall not in any way indicate approval by the commission of the proposed site or photovoltaic energy facility. Section 58-33-540. (A) An applicant for a certificate must file an application with the commission, in such form as the commission may prescribe. The application must contain the following information: (1) a description of the location and of the photovoltaic energy facility to be built; (2) a summary of any studies which have been made by or for the applicant regarding the environmental impact of the photovoltaic energy facility; (3) a statement explaining the need for the photovoltaic energy facility; and (4) any other information as the applicant may consider relevant or as the commission may by regulation or order require. A copy of the study referred to in item (2) must be filed with the commission, if ordered, and must be available for public information. (B) Each application must be accompanied by proof of service of a copy of the application on the Regulatory Staff, the chief executive officer of each municipality, and the head of each state and local governmental agency, charged with the duty of protecting the environment or of planning land use, in the area in the county in which any portion of the photovoltaic energy facility is to be located. The copy of the application must be accompanied by a notice specifying the date on or about which the application is to be filed. (C) Each application also must be accompanied by proof that written public notice was given at least 90 days prior to the date on which the application was filed with the commission to persons residing in the municipalities entitled to receive notice pursuant to subsection (B), by the publication of a summary of the application, and the date on or about which it is to be filed, and in newspapers of general circulation as will serve substantially to inform the persons of the application. (D) Inadvertent failure of service on, or notice to, any of the municipalities, governmental agencies, or persons identified in subsections (B) and (C) may be cured pursuant to the orders of the commission designed to afford them adequate notice to enable their effective participation in the proceeding. In addition, the commission may, after filing, require the applicant to serve notice of the application or copies, or both, upon the other persons, and file proof, as the commission may deem appropriate. (E) An application for an amendment of a certificate must be in the form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. Notice of the application must be given as provided in subsections (B) and (C). Section 58-33-550. (A) Upon receipt of an application complying with Section 58-33-540, the commission must promptly establish a date for the commencement of a public hearing not less than sixty days nor more than ninety days after the receipt of the application. This public hearing must take place within the county where the farmland is located and is intended to allow the public to present testimony to the commission regarding the potential photovoltaic energy facility. (B) Upon the receipt of an application complying with Section 58-33-540, the commission must promptly establish a date for the commencement of a hearing not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred twenty days after the receipt of the application and must conclude the proceedings as expeditiously as practicable. The testimony at the hearing may be presented in writing or orally, provided that the commission may make rules designed to exclude repetitive, redundant, or irrelevant testimony. (C) The commission must hold a hearing regarding an application to amend a certificate in the same manner as a hearing for an application for a certificate if the proposed change in the photovoltaic energy facility would result in any significant increase in any environmental impact of the facility or a substantial change in the location of all or a portion of the facility. The commission must forward a copy of the application to amend a certificate to all parties upon the filing of the application. Section 58-33-560. (A) The parties to a certification proceeding must include: (1) the applicant; (2) the Regulatory Staff, the Department of Health and Environmental Control, the Department of Natural Resources, all land-grant universities in the State, the Department of Agriculture, and the Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism; (3) each municipality and governmental agency entitled to receive service of a copy of the application pursuant to Section 55-33-540(B) that filed with the commission a notice of intervention as a party within thirty days after the date it was served with a copy of the application; and (4) any person residing in a municipality entitled to receive service of a copy of the application pursuant to Section 55-33-540, any domestic nonprofit organization formed in whole or in part to promote conservation or natural beauty, to protect the environment, personal health, or other biological values, to preserve historical sites, to promote consumer interest, to represent commercial and industrial groups, or to promote the orderly development of the area in which the photovoltaic energy facility is to be located, or any other person that petitioned the commission for leave to intervene as a party, within thirty days after the date given in the published notice as the date for filing the application, and if the petition has been granted by the commission for good cause shown. (B) The commission may, in extraordinary circumstances for good cause shown, and giving consideration to the need for the timely start of construction of the photovoltaic energy facility, grant a petition for leave to intervene as a party to participate in subsequent phases of the proceeding, filed by a municipality, governmental agency, person, or organization described in subsection (A)(2) or (3) of this section, but which failed to file a timely notice of intervention or petition for leave to intervene. Section 58-33-570. (A) A record must be made of all hearings and of all testimony taken and the cross-examination. Upon request of a party, either before or after the decision, a state agency which either proposes to require or does require a condition to be included in the certificate as provided in Section 58-33-580 must furnish for the record all factual findings, documents, studies, rules, regulations, standards, or other documentation supporting the condition. (B) The commission may provide for the consolidation of the representation of parties having similar interests. Section 58-33-580. (A) The commission must render a decision upon the record either granting or denying the application as filed, or granting it upon the terms, conditions, or modifications of the construction, operation, or maintenance of the photovoltaic energy facility on farmland as the commission may deem appropriate; such conditions must be as determined by the applicable state agency having jurisdiction or authority under statutes, rules, regulations, or standards promulgated thereunder, and the conditions must become a part of the certificate. The commission may not grant a certificate for the construction, operation, and maintenance of a photovoltaic energy facility on farmland, either as proposed or as modified by the commission, unless it shall find and determine: (1) that public convenience and necessity require the construction of the photovoltaic energy facility; (2) that construction of the photovoltaic energy facility on farmland is just and reasonable and in the public interest; and (3) a determination that the loss of farmland due to construction of the photovoltaic energy facility is outweighed by the quantifiable net benefits to the State from the construction of the photovoltaic energy facility. (B) If the commission determines that the location of all or a part of the proposed photovoltaic energy facility should be modified, it may condition its certificate upon the modification, provided that the municipalities and persons residing therein affected by the modification have been given reasonable notice. (C) A copy of the decision and any opinion must be served by the commission upon each party. Section 58-33-590. The commission must issue an order within one hundred eighty days from the date on which the application is filed. In rendering a decision on an application for a certificate, the commission must issue an opinion stating its reasons for the action taken. Section 58-33-600. (A) All entities and persons filing an application pursuant to Section 58-33-540 must bear the costs associated with the filing that are incurred by the Regulatory Staff and the commission, except for filings made pursuant to Section 58-33-540 by an entity that is a public utility that pays a license tax pursuant to Section 12-20-100. (B)(1) If costs are due, the Regulatory Staff must report to the Department of Revenue all costs incurred by the Regulatory Staff in investigating the application filed pursuant to Section 58-33-540. These costs must be paid by the person that filed the application to the Department of Revenue and the costs must be remitted to the Regulatory Staff within thirty days of the Regulatory Staff making the report to the Department of Revenue. (2) The Regulatory Staff must report all costs incurred pursuant to item (1) to Department of Revenue not later than one year from the date the costs were incurred. (C)(1) If costs are due, the commission must report to the Department of Revenue all costs incurred by the commission in adjudicating the application filed pursuant to Section 58-33-540. These costs must be paid by the person that filed the application to the Department of Revenue and the costs must be remitted to the commission within thirty days of the commission making the report to the Department of Revenue. (2) The commission must report all costs incurred pursuant to item (1) to the Department of Revenue not later than one year from the date the costs were incurred. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----